Connecticut, session 2026, SB00512.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated" means the corporation
created under section 32-35 of the general statutes;
(2) "Potential estate tax exposure" means the estimated tax liability of
a resident of this state under section 12-391 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, as determined and certified by the Commissioner
of Revenue Services based on the resident's estimated net taxable estate
at the time of election under this section;
(3) "Qualified Connecticut business" means a business entity that
maintains its principal place of business in this state and has at least
seventy-five per cent of its employees domiciled in this state; and
(4) "Resident of this state" has the same meaning as provided in
LCO No. 3371 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 512
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 12-701 of the general statutes.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, any resident of this state may elect
to invest a one-time payment in the Connecticut Growth Investment
Fund in accordance with the provisions of this section, in lieu of such
resident's estate being subject to the tax imposed by section 12-391 of the
general statutes, as amended by this act. The amount of such payment
shall be thirty per cent, forty per cent or fifty per cent, as selected by
such resident, of such resident's maximum potential estate tax exposure.
(c) (1) Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated shall establish, not later
than January 1, 2027, a Connecticut Growth Investment Fund that shall
(A) be managed under a pooled fund structure by Connecticut
Innovations, Incorporated, (B) invest exclusively in qualified
Connecticut businesses, (C) hold the principal of any payment made to
the fund as a contingent investment, returnable only in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, and (D) allocate not less
than ten per cent of the amount in the fund to be made available for
investments in qualified Connecticut businesses founded by student or
faculty entrepreneurs affiliated with institutions of higher education in
this state.
(2) Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated shall be entitled to an
annual management fee of not more than two per cent of the total assets
under management in the fund, for the administration, due diligence
and oversight of the fund's investment portfolio.
(d) (1) Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated shall establish three
distinct investor classes for the Connecticut Growth Investment Fund,
based on the percentage of the potential estate tax exposure selected by
the resident under subsection (b) of this section:
(A) Class A senior preferred units shall be for residents of this state
who make an investment of fifty per cent of such resident's potential
estate tax exposure. This investor class shall receive first-priority
distribution of realized gains and the highest rate of preferred returns
LCO No. 3371 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 512
from the fund;
(B) Class B preferred units shall be for residents of this state who
make an investment of forty per cent of such resident's potential estate
tax exposure. This investor class shall receive priority over Class C
investors for the distribution of realized gains; and
(C) Class C common units shall be for residents of this state who
make an investment of thirty per cent of such resident's potential estate
tax exposure. This investor class shall receive the baseline rate for the
distribution of realized gains.
(2) Upon the realization of any gains from any investment made by
the fund, Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated shall remit ten per cent
of the net realized profit to the General Fund prior to making any
distributions to a resident or a decedent's estate or designated
beneficiary.
(e) (1) If a resident of this state who made a payment under subsection
(b) of this section remains a resident until the time of death and such
death occurs at least five years after the date such payment was made,
(A) the initial payment amount shall be permanently retained by the
Connecticut Growth Investment Fund for continued investment in
qualified Connecticut businesses, (B) the right to receive future
distributions of realized gains and preferred returns shall vest in the
decedent's estate or designated beneficiaries, and (C) any tax liability of
the decedent's estate under section 12-391 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, shall be extinguished.
(2) If a resident of this state who made a payment under subsection
(b) of this section dies within five years of the date such payment was
made and was a resident of this state at the time of death, (A) the amount
of such payment shall be credited toward the amount of such decedent
estate's tax liability under section 12-391 of the general statutes, as
amended by this act, and (B) the estate's right to distributions of realized
gains and preferred returns at the time of death shall be determined in
LCO No. 3371 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 512
accordance with the following schedule: (i) If the death occurs prior to
the second anniversary of the date the payment was made, one hundred
per cent of any realized gains and preferred returns shall be forfeited to
the fund; (ii) if the death occurs on or after the second anniversary but
prior to the third anniversary of the date the payment was made, thirty-
three per cent of any realized gains and preferred returns shall be
forfeited to the fund; (iii) if the death occurs on or after the third
anniversary but prior to the fourth anniversary of the date the payment
was made, sixty-six per cent of any realized gains and preferred returns
shall be forfeited to the fund; and (iv) if the death occurs on or after the
fourth anniversary but prior to the fifth anniversary of the date the
payment was made, the decedent's estate shall receive distribution of
one hundred per cent of any realized gains and preferred returns.
(3) If a resident of this state who made a payment under subsection
(b) of this section subsequently ceases to be a resident of this state at any
time, (A) the initial payment amount made by such person shall be
returned without interest not later than twenty-four months after such
person has certified to Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated of such
person's change of domicile, or as fund liquidity permits, and (B) such
person's right to receive future distributions of realized gains and
preferred returns shall be forfeited.
(f) Not later than April 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, Connecticut
Innovations, Incorporated shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
100 relating to finance, revenue and bonding, that includes, for the calendar
101 year immediately preceding: (1) The number of qualified Connecticut
102 businesses receiving investment funds from the Connecticut Growth
103 Investment Fund and the industry sectors of each such business; (2) the
104 overall performance and internal rate of return of the fund; and (3) a
105 data-driven analysis, prepared in consultation with the Department of
106 Revenue Services and the Department of Economic and Community
107 Development, of the indirect tax revenue generated by the investments
LCO No. 3371 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 512
108 made by the Connecticut Growth Investment Fund, including estimated
109 revenue for the taxes imposed by chapters 219 and 229 of the general
110 statutes from increased business activity in this state and new or
111 retained jobs in this state.
112 Sec. 2. Subdivision (9) of subsection (g) of section 12-391 of the general
113 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
114 (Effective from passage):
115 (9) [With] (A) Except as provided under subparagraph (B) of this
116 subdivision, with respect to the estates of decedents dying on or after
117 January 1, 2023, the tax based on the Connecticut taxable estate shall be
118 as provided in the following schedule:
T1 Amount of Connecticut
T2 Taxable Estate Rate of Tax
T3 Not over the None
T4 federal basic exclusion amount
T5 Over the 12% of the excess over the
T6 federal basic exclusion amount federal basic exclusion amount
119 (B) The provisions of section 1 of this act shall apply to the estate of a
120 decedent dying on or after January 1, 2027, where such decedent made
121 a payment to the Connecticut Growth Investment Fund in accordance
122 with the provisions of said section, provided any applicable exemption
123 under section 1 of this act for the tax imposed by this section shall not
124 relieve any person from the obligation to file a return under the
125 provisions of this chapter.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage 12-391(g)(9)
LCO No. 3371 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 512